South Dakota, session 2026, HB1313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-3:
The South Dakota Board of Education Standards shall recommend resources for
age-appropriate and research-based instruction in prenatal human growth and
development. A school district shall use the resources recommended by the board in
providing a health or science curriculum.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-3:
The instruction in prenatal human growth and development required under section
1 of this Act must include:
(1) A high-definition ultrasound video that shows the presence of the brain, heart, and
other major organs as they appear at various stages of prenatal development; and
(2) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation, or a high-definition
ultrasound video that shows the progress of prenatal human development from
fertilization through birth, noting significant moments in the progress of cellular
growth and organ development.
Any video or computer-generated rendering or animation shown, as required by
this section, must be at least three minutes in length.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-3:
The age-appropriate, research-based, instruction in prenatal human growth and
development required under section 1 of this Act may not include any book, article,
outline, handout, video, or other material produced or provided by an entity that:
(1) Performs abortions;
(2) Promotes abortion;

26.7.32 2 1313
(3) Contracts or subcontracts with an entity that performs abortions or promotes
abortion;
(4) Becomes or continues to be affiliated with an entity that performs abortions or
promotes abortions; or
(5) Regularly makes referrals to an entity that provides abortions or promotes
abortion.
HB1313 ENROLLED

26.7.32 3 1313
An Act to require education in prenatal human growth and development.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1313
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1313 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1313 ENROLLED